Utah statutes.
17B-1-503.   Withdrawal or boundary adjustment with municipal approval.

(1)  A municipality and a local district whose boundaries adjoin or overlap may adjust the boundary of the local district to include more or less of the municipality in the local district by following the same procedural requirements as set forth in Section 17B-1-417 for boundary adjustments between adjoining local districts.

(2)  After a boundary adjustment under Subsection (1) is complete, the local district shall provide the same service to any area added to the local district as provided to other areas within the local district and the municipality shall provide the same service that the local district previously provided to any area withdrawn from the local district.

(3)  No area within a municipality may be added to the area of a local district under this section if the area is part of a local district that provides the same wholesale or retail service as the first local district.

